Hawaii statutes.
§109-7 Enforcement; penalty. (a) Any
law enforcement officer who has police powers to arrest offenders and issue
citations, including any police officer of the counties, shall have the
authority to enforce any rule promulgated pursuant to section 109-2(4).

(b) Any person violating any rule of the
stadium authority regulating conduct on the stadium premises shall be guilty of
a petty misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding $1,000, or imprisonment
not exceeding thirty days, or both.

(c) Any person violating any rule of the
stadium authority regulating parking or traffic on the stadium premises shall
have committed a traffic infraction as set forth in chapter 291D, the
adjudication of which shall be subject to the provisions contained therein. [L
1982, c 235, §1; am L 1996, c 159, §1; am L 1999, c 160, §11; am L 2016, c 61,
§7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next